Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Chapter 15

Honey [Repealed]

53-15-101. [Repealed.]

Acts 2011, ch. 286, § 1; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 527, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 15, §§ 53-15-101 — 53-15-103, concerned labeling and testing of honey.

53-15-102. [Repealed.]

Acts 2011, ch. 286, § 1; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 527, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 15, §§ 53-15-101 — 53-15-103, concerned labeling and testing of honey.

53-15-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 2011, ch. 286, § 1; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 527, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 53, ch. 15, §§ 53-15-101 — 53-15-103, concerned labeling and testing of honey.